Chapter 21: Arrogant and Overbearing Young Lady 12

This was his first time holding a girl’s waist, and the girl was his half-sister, the high-and-mighty girl, An Cui, who had never cared for him. It felt strange. Though she was sharp and could hurt people anytime, she indeed had a surprisingly soft and delicate side, whether it was her waist or her heart.

Holding her waist, almost leaning against her back, and perhaps due to the half-wet clothes, he surprisingly found that the woman he intended to vent his future revenge on was so warm, making him feel as though even the cold of winter could be chased away.

Lan Shengzhe had a fever. After returning to the Lan family, he immediately changed into dry clothes, drank some porridge, took medicine, and went to bed to sleep. According to the servants assigned to take care of him, he muttered in his sleep the whole night, intermittently calling out "sister."

Sister? Which sister does he have?

For a moment, the servants in the annex felt some pity for him, while others thought it was what he deserved. The more these opinions spread, the more it reached the ears of his grandparents. They had heard about it, but they didn’t show any expression, only glancing at him more than usual during mealtime.

Naturally, this news also reached An Cui’s ears.

An Cui did not react. She got up and went to school. Even with a slight fever, Lan Shengzhe immediately grabbed both his and her school bags and followed her.

Probably because of the fever, Lan Shengzhe was a bit muddled, and only on his way back to his class after sending An Cui to hers did he realize he had grabbed the wrong bag. Since all the bags at their school were issued by the school and looked the same, he had absent-mindedly left his on An Cui’s desk and taken hers instead. As class was about to start, if she opened the bag and found his things inside, she would surely get angry. He quickly turned around and headed upstairs.

"That shameless bastard Lan Shengzhe, doesn’t he know how disgusting he is to you?!" He suddenly heard an agitated female voice. Stopping in his tracks, he immediately hid behind the wall.

The voice came from the upper stairwell, and it sounded familiar, probably one of An Cui's lackeys.

"His very existence is like a hammer that shatters your father's image of authority! He’s the proof of his betrayal of your mother! What legitimate child wouldn't find him disgusting? You're such a proud person, I can't believe you don't hate him! I only got someone to deal with him because I wanted to make you happy! Shengmei, we are the ones who are your true friends!"

"That's right, we did all of this for your sake, Shengmei..."

"Enough," An Cui said coldly. "You only think he’s affecting your interests. Stop using these pretentious reasons to fool me. Lan Shengzhe, no matter how much I dislike him, is still my half-brother. No one else has the right to bully him except me."

Lan Shengzhe froze.

There was another round of arguing and pleading, and then it became quiet. It seemed they had left.

Lan Shengzhe leaned against the wall, and it wasn't until the school bell rang that he suddenly came back to his senses. He hurriedly grabbed his school bag and went upstairs.

It seemed that An Cui had just opened her bag and was frowning at his math book. Lan Shengzhe rushed in and exchanged bags with her. Glancing at An Cui’s face, he saw a bit of disdain and impatience, but she didn’t say anything.

Lan Shengzhe carried his own bag downstairs. The bell had already rung for class, but he wasn’t in a hurry to return to his class. As he walked, he couldn’t stop thinking about An Cui’s words...

No, calm down, Lan Shengzhe, do you really want to forget how your mother died? Why does An Cui find his existence disgusting? What authority does that man even have? Even if he didn’t exist, he was an unfaithful man. Even if An Cui might actually see him as a brother, she just sees him as a brother she can bully or abandon, like a worthless, emotionless dog.

He took a deep breath, suppressing the strange feeling in his heart, and walked on with a gloomy expression.

When he returned to his seat in class, he found a few letters in his drawer. Opening one, he saw more words of encouragement, even some curses against An Cui, showing their righteous indignation.

It was ridiculous. They didn’t even have the courage to leave their names on the letters, but they wanted to save him? They thought writing a few words didn’t cost much effort or anything, pretending to be on his side, but they were actually just venting their dissatisfaction with An Cui. Some even subtly urged him to resist An Cui, trying to make her suffer.

He had met too many people like that. Maybe human nature was just that disgusting.

Lan Shengzhe thought coldly but still put on a grateful and obedient face, carefully putting the letters in his bag, intending to deal with them after school.

However, when he got in the car after school, he hadn’t yet had time to handle these letters, when An Cui said, “Give me your bag.”

Lan Shengzhe immediately broke out in a cold sweat, his heart pounding. He thought, “Did she find out? Does she know I have things in my bag that she dislikes? What will happen if she sees these letters? What kind of punishment will she give me?”

Seeing him frozen, An Cui raised an eyebrow and asked, “Do I need to say it again?”

Lan Shengzhe had no choice but to nervously pass her the bag, his heart racing as he quickly thought of ways to minimize An Cui’s anger.

An Cui unzipped his bag and casually pulled out a few books and exercise books. As she looked at them, her frown deepened. “Lan Shengzhe, you can’t even get these simple questions right? Are you planning to fail the midterm exam?”

Lan Shengzhe: “...”

Later that evening, An Cui instructed the servants to dump a thick stack of test papers and exercises in front of Lan Shengzhe. 524 felt a sense of dread. Lan Shengzhe instantly wished he could turn back time to the morning and knock some sense into himself so he wouldn’t have grabbed the wrong bag. Then An Cui wouldn’t have seen his math book, wouldn’t have found out he was struggling to keep up with the schoolwork, and he wouldn’t have ended up in this predicament.

The fact that Lan Shengzhe couldn’t keep up with the schoolwork wasn’t entirely his fault. The school was a noble institution that placed great emphasis on academic performance. With such strong teachers and top-tier textbooks, it was normal for Lan Shengzhe to fall behind after transferring from his previous school.

However, An Cui felt that if he got a poor grade on the midterm exam, it would be embarrassing for her, so she scolded him and demanded that he improve his grades immediately.

Lan Shengzhe sat at his desk, staring at the crazy pile of homework An Cui had assigned. After a while, he suddenly slapped his face. This was a golden opportunity! It was as if someone had handed him a pillow when he was feeling sleepy.

Lan Shengzhe quickly seized the chance. Whenever he encountered a question he couldn’t solve, he shamelessly went to An Cui for help, knowing she would often teach him.

He was surprised to find that An Cui was such a scholar. Though she had always been a good student, her arrogant and overbearing attitude made her seem like someone who wouldn’t bother to study. Yet, when she explained the questions, she did so with ease, as if it was second nature to her.

He often found himself entranced by her voice as she explained, then quickly snapped out of it, as though nothing had happened. Deep down, he felt uneasy. Was this really the right way forward?

No, no, no. This is exactly what he wanted. The more she invests in him now, the deeper her feelings will grow. She won’t see him as a dog anymore, and he can use her to gain more power. Once he’s strong enough, he’ll take revenge and avenge his mother!

~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
==================================================================================


Chapter 22: Arrogant and Domineering Young Lady 13

Everyone in the Lan family noticed that since Lan Shengzhe had that fever, he had become increasingly clingy toward An Cui. Yes, clingy. If before, he had only reluctantly been attentive to her, now it was as if An Cui had conquered him, and he had started sticking to her. The humiliation and restraint on his face had disappeared, replaced by genuine affection from a younger brother to an older sister. His speech became more natural, and he occasionally shamelessly acted cute toward An Cui, even calling her "sister" in an audacious way.

Though An Cui hadn’t been particularly kind to him, she didn’t seem to mind and hadn’t stopped him from following her around. To many, it seemed that the young lady had started accepting his pace.

There was even a time when they caught An Cui teaching Lan Shengzhe how to do homework!

In short, because of this, he was no longer invisible in the Lan family. At least when he wasn't at the dinner table, his grandparents would occasionally ask about him.

He had broken the deadlock, making a small crack in a world where he didn’t belong. Like another bubble, he stuck to it, gradually merging himself with the larger bubble.

524 couldn’t help but remind An Cui: [He’s trying to use you and manipulate your rhythm.]

[I know.]

524: [Considering how much hate you’ve drawn from the male lead, my advice is to just get rid of him, or he’ll make sure to grind you to dust in the future.] After all, he had already broken the pot, so it was pointless to expect any romantic development with the male lead. The priority now was to avoid being bullied.

[No.]

524: [Why not?]

[This is how the game is played, and isn’t this what you wanted to see?]

[...] Fine, he kept quiet.

He Yi Zhou observed from the sidelines, thinking that Lan Shengmei, that self-centered and arrogant person, was probably no match for this younger brother.

But why should he care? Although displeased, it was still better to seize this opportunity to break up with An Cui.

However, before he could break up with An Cui, something else happened.

After being slapped in the women’s restroom and soaked with water, Shu Baoli trembled all over, her veins popping as she could no longer hold her anger in.

Just then, she received a message on her phone.

“I think you could use this.”

Along with the message came a video. She opened it, and it was a recording from the volleyball practice match she and An Cui had participated in. The video didn’t capture the moment when she hit An Cui, but it did show An Cui repeatedly hitting her, and in the end, her sitting on the ground crying.

Even if the video had captured her hitting An Cui, it didn’t matter because, in comparison to An Cui’s arrogant and domineering attitude later on, her hit seemed insignificant. Anyone who saw this video would feel sympathy for her, the one being hit, and disgust for An Cui, the one bullying her.

“What’s your goal?” Shu Baoli replied.

“Of course, the goal is for you to get back at Lan Shengmei. This person is too arrogant and annoying, right?”

Shu Baoli coldly curled her lips. She didn’t mind being used as a pawn because she was so furious. That woman had gone too far, so she gladly accepted this timely help.

After school, Shu Baoli didn’t go home. She went online.

She had a Weibo account under the name “Baoli is Baby,” with 200,000 followers. She had gained fame by posting about luxury bags, clothes, and some public little diaries. These diaries shared bits and pieces of her life, either real or fabricated, about family relationships or her ambiguous friendship/romance with a childhood friend. They were written in a cute and sweet way, occasionally posting lovely pictures of herself, making her account feel like a novel. Some believed it was fake, others thought it was real, but over the years, she had gained so many followers.

However, Shu Baoli didn’t post the video with her main account. She first uploaded it with a secondary account, titled: [Money really can make you do whatever you want…] Then, she skillfully hired internet trolls, and finally used another secondary account to pretend to recognize the person being hit as Shu Baoli, tagging her main account and notifying her group chat...

She had been on Weibo for many years, mastering these marketing tactics. After completing the first step, she used another small account to expose An Cui’s identity as the daughter of the Lan family, which immediately brought attention to a famous domestic conglomerate and the current hot topic of school bullying. It quickly gained massive attention and shot up to the trending searches.

#Lan Family Young Lady School Bullying#

#Baoli is Baby#

The two hashtags shot to the top of the trending list with astonishing speed.

“My God, this is too much, again and again!”

“I’m so angry I could cry. So many people, and not one of them tried to stop it, even helped the bully by passing the ball to that female tyrant. I can’t imagine how cold the bullied girl must have felt.”

“Today’s kids are really demons. Lan Shengmei is the demon among demons!”

“The Lan family is so rich, making so much money, and this is the kind of person they raised??”

“I’ll never buy anything from the Lan family again!”

“Lan Shengmei, come out and apologize! Lan family, come out and apologize!!”

“I saw the bullied girl’s Weibo. She’s such a cute angel, I can only imagine how heartbroken her parents must be!”

“Boycott everything under the Lan family’s brand!!”

…

The comments from netizens were overwhelmingly in Shu Baoli’s favor. Lan Shengmei did have a Weibo, but since An Cui took over, she hadn’t logged in. Her Weibo was dug up, and a flood of strangers swarmed in, leaving all kinds of insults.

Shu Baoli couldn’t help but want to post something on her main account, but she quickly remembered that she shouldn’t speak out. Sometimes silence was the most powerful weapon.

After handling all this, she left the internet, feeling completely satisfied.

She was curious how Lan Shengmei would try to explain herself, because she was indeed such an arrogant person. If reporters went to interview anyone from the school, the words they’d hear would only make Lan Shengmei’s image worse! Was it possible for anyone to lie through their teeth and say that Lan Shengmei was kind-hearted and never bullied her classmates?

This incident quickly gained traction online, with more people claiming to be students from her school, saying that Lan Shengmei had indeed been bullying Shu Baoli. Lan Shengmei had a domineering personality, and was known as a school bully who walked all over her school. Even her younger siblings were afraid of her and were treated like slaves. This whole situation pushed Lan Shengmei and the Lan family to the forefront.

Lan Shengzhe watched the insults directed at An Cui online and frowned as he read the filthy language. What was this feeling? He clearly hated the Lan family, hated An Cui, yet when he saw these hateful comments online, he didn’t feel any sense of satisfaction.

He even felt that this method of revenge, against An Cui's proud, beautiful, and arrogant stance... was so beneath her.


==========================================================================


Chapter 23: The Arrogant and Domineering Young Lady 14

The Lan family quickly received the news, and the public relations department immediately started handling the situation. However, their young lady stopped them, saying this matter concerned the Lan Group and wasn’t just about Lan Shengmei. Initially, they disagreed, but An Cui said, "Can the Lan family go bankrupt just because some netizens are protesting for a few days? Will the stock prices crash? Will the malls be empty tomorrow?"

Of course not. Despite the anger of netizens right now, as long as there isn't any hidden influence, the trending topic will only last for about three days before being replaced by something else. Within a few days, people will forget about it. They’ll buy what they want, go to the malls as usual, and no one will remember, "Oh, that young lady from the Lan Group is a bad person, causing trouble at school." Netizens have shown time and again how easily they forget things. As long as the Lan family’s products aren’t of poor quality, they’ll still sell as much as they ever did.

As for the stock prices, they won’t drop much, and once the heat dies down, they’ll rise again. Such a colossal company—do they really think a little online fuss can bring them down? Ridiculous.

But a grand corporation like this can't be played with so recklessly.

In the end, it proved that when you’re favored, you can do whatever you want. The grandparents made a firm decision: their precious granddaughter could do as she pleased.

Seeing An Cui and the Lan family completely indifferent to the situation, Lan Shengzhe couldn’t help but feel that the storm was coming. He had to retreat to his room, hide in the bathroom, and call Shu Baoli.

“Did you have something to do with what’s going on online, Baoli?”

“Yes,” Shu Baoli replied, her tone reflecting the satisfaction of a successful revenge.

Lan Shengzhe took a deep breath. “Don’t make it too simple. Stop now. This incident won’t cause any significant harm to the Lan family, nor to her. But to you...”

“Zhe, who’s side are you on? Who do you think I’m doing this for?!” Shu Baoli interrupted him angrily. She had been harboring grievances for a long time. Who did she go after An Cui for, only to be bullied like that with campus violence? She was a girl, and she liked him. When she was hurt, she wanted her prince to save her. But what happened? He had been coldly watching, even getting closer to An Cui!

Although Lan Shengzhe said it was part of his plan, that he was pursuing An Cui, Shu Baoli couldn’t help but feel uncomfortable. From the time they met in that small town, growing up together as childhood friends, Shu Baoli had always seen him as hers. His smile was only for her, and he would always be kind to her.

But now, he was like a little puppy wagging its tail around An Cui, always revolving around her. His radiant smile was always directed at her. Even if he said it was all just an act, his life now revolved around An Cui. He took forever to respond to her messages, and when asked about what he was doing, he always mentioned An Cui. She couldn’t bear it anymore.

“Baoli, I’ve told you before not to get involved. This is my business, I have my own plans. I know what I’m doing.”

Shu Baoli could hardly contain her jealousy. “You really know what you’re doing? Don’t you look in the mirror? How bright your smile is when you’re with her! How humble you are when you’re serving her!”

“Don’t you know why I’m doing that?!” Lan Shengzhe was also angered.

“Really? Are you sure you’re not feeling guilty when you say that?”

Lan Shengzhe tried to ignore the panic that hit him as his secret was exposed, masking his discomfort with anger. “Enough. This is my business, Baoli. I didn’t need your help, so don’t lecture me with a betrayed tone. I know exactly what I’m doing and why!”

Lan Shengzhe was about to hang up when he suddenly heard Shu Baoli crying. “I’m sorry, Zhe. I’m sorry. I just feel so miserable lately. I’ve been bullied at school, and you’re the only real friend I have. But these days, you’ve been with Lan Shengmei all the time. I feel so terrible. That’s why I said all those things. Please forgive me…”

In an instant, Lan Shengzhe was reminded of their past in the small town, how they had been neglected and isolated, how they had relied on each other. His heart softened.

“I’m sorry, but I really can only pretend we’re just ordinary classmates now. I can’t help you. She doesn’t like you, and if she finds out we’re friends, all the efforts I’ve made so far will be wasted. I’m really grateful for your concern, but I know what I need to do now. You don’t need to help me anymore. An Cui is planning her counterattack against you, and I don’t know what she’s planning, so you’d better think if she has anything on you and prepare in advance.”

This was all he could do now, just remind her. He was still in An Cui’s grasp and had no way of helping her.

After ending the call with Lan Shengzhe, Shu Baoli sat in her chair, thinking. What kind of leverage could An Cui possibly have on her? Did she have anything like An Cui that could be criticized? No. She waited to see what An Cui would do.

The situation continued to ferment. The next day, everyone at school looked at An Cui strangely. She went straight to the broadcasting station and made a school-wide announcement, warning the teachers and students that anyone who looked at her like they were watching a monkey would be turned into a monkey in the zoo. She successfully made everyone stop staring at her.

This message quickly spread online.

[What the hell, this is an outright threat! Anyone who looks at her will be bullied and turned into a monkey in the zoo, right?]

[Isn’t the school just standing by?]

[Don’t you know? Lan family is one of the investors of the school, so they have to kowtow to her.]

[This is unbelievable! How can someone so arrogant and beautiful also be so evil inside?]

[The saying that beautiful women are the most evil is true!]

[I just want to drag her out and slap her a few times…]

[…]

The situation online grew worse, but An Cui remained calm and unfazed, showing no signs of losing her appetite.

An Ran suddenly put down his bowl. "Senior."

An Cui chewed on her sweet and sour ribs and looked up at him.

An Ran leaned forward, his once lazy face now full of impatience and irritability. "Are you stupid?"

"?"

"With all this online drama, aren’t you angry?"

"Why should I be angry?"

"Being slandered and not angry? You really are stupid!"

"Slander? Who’s slandering me? I’m arrogant and unreasonable, if I don’t like someone, I beat them. If I want to enslave someone, I enslave them. What I said this morning was exactly what I meant. Where’s the problem?" An Cui couldn’t help but tease him, seeing how much he cared.

"Everything is wrong! If you don’t like someone, it’s their fault for being disliked by you. If they get beaten, they deserve it! That’s not arrogance, that’s just plain bullying!" An Ran said, as if it was obvious.

An Cui was stunned. She was shocked. Her character was supposed to be the arrogant and spoiled young lady who could never be cleared of her reputation, but now someone was trying to clear her name? The others around them were equally stunned, knowing that An Ran seemed to have a soft spot for An Cui, but they didn’t expect it to go this far! If this wasn’t arrogance, what was?

An Cui suddenly smiled. "Oh, is that so? Then how about you help me kill that Shu Baoli?"

An Ran was taken aback but then smiled, revealing his little tiger teeth. His eyes were full of playful joy, looking both handsome and cute, with a charming, mischievous vibe.

"Sure. But I want your ribs." He leaned forward, snatched the rib from An Cui’s chopsticks, and ate it.

An Ran said he’d help, and it looked like he wasn’t waiting for An Cui’s word before taking action—he was already prepared. So, just as An Cui was planning her move, he had already released everything.

At this point, online opinion had shifted to support Shu Baoli, and she thought An Cui was just bluffing. But then, a video was posted online.

This video was of the entire volleyball match, showing that it was Shu Baoli who had suggested the match to Jiang Qin, and then she fought for position and hit An Cui with the ball. After that, An Cui started hitting Shu Baoli back.

[????]

[So Shu Baoli was the one who started it?]

[Didn’t you see Shu Baoli apologize immediately? She made a mistake and apologized right away. But what did Lan Shengmei do? Tit for tat is one thing, but this is bullying!]

[Using this video to clear her name isn’t going to work.]

[Finally, the Lan family’s PR team has started? Too slow. What good is PR now?]

However, soon after, this netizen released other pictures and information, exposing Shu Baoli’s family background. The loving parents she often posted about on her Weibo, who appeared to be a perfect couple in her diary, turned out to be a cheating scumbag and his mistress. The scumbag is the CEO of Shu Real Estate. Initially, due to his lack of business ability, he wasn't the original heir, but just a university professor. Later, his capable younger brother unexpectedly passed away, and that’s when he became the CEO.

Because of his incompetence, he married a capable wife, who managed the company while he continued to work as a professor. Then he started an affair with one of his students and had Shu Baoli. Last year, when his wife fell ill, the scumbag took over the company and immediately divorced his wife, using money to threaten her: if she didn’t divorce him, he would prevent her from receiving treatment. He forced this powerful woman to sign the divorce agreement, after which he brought his mistress and illegitimate daughter back into the family. It was also the powerful woman’s fault for being so naive, believing the scumbag’s outward appearance and superb acting skills; otherwise, she wouldn't have ended up in this situation.

Netizens were shocked, unable to believe it. Just a few days ago, in their minds, Shu Baoli was a pitiful little angel, a princess being bullied by an evil dragon. But now, they found out that she was the illegitimate daughter of such despicable people? Looking back at the warm family diaries she posted on her Weibo, showcasing expensive gifts from her parents, it suddenly dawned on them that all those things were actually earned by the legitimate wife. The realization was so disgusting that they felt like vomiting up their last meal.

But it didn’t stop there. The netizen also revealed that Shu Baoli, back when she was in school, would pick on anyone she didn’t like and hire troublemakers from the school or even outsiders to teach them a lesson. After tracking IP addresses, they found surveillance footage, showing how Shu Baoli staged a drama of being a victim. She was clearly the same as An Cui, but worse. At least An Cui had a clean background and was truly the daughter of a respectable family! The most important part was, An Cui was arrogant and open about it, while Shu Baoli acted so innocent, but in reality…?!?

“Never seen such a disgusting family of three!!”

“Poor CEO Su, no wonder Shu Real Estate has been struggling this year, it turns out the person in charge has changed!”

“So disgusting, still trying to use the internet to take revenge on Lan Shengmei. How shameless can you be? You deserve to know your place, you deserve to eat shit and be beaten to death!”

“Compared to Lan Shengmei, Lan Shengmei is a fairy in the sky, and you are just dog poop on the ground! At least Lan Shengmei is open about it, she's hundreds of times better than you!”

“Typical of a mistress’s daughter, such a schemer!”

“….”

Shu Baoli’s Weibo was immediately flooded with comments. The diaries about expensive gifts and loving parents pricked the eyes of netizens, who retaliated with an even greater intensity than when they attacked An Cui. Comments and private messages flooded in, with nothing but insults. If just a few days ago she was the beloved little princess, now she was a piece of disgusting dog shit, turning everyone’s stomach.

In comparison, watching the video of An Cui slapping Shu Baoli with a volleyball was incredibly satisfying. Netizens quickly made GIFs to spread online, showing An Cui jumping up and slamming a volleyball into Shu Baoli’s face, causing her to fall to the ground. The captions read: “This is what you get for being cheap!” / “Shameless!” / “Go to hell!” / …

An Cui’s expression after slapping Shu Baoli was also turned into a meme with captions like: “Who do you think you are?” / “Let me show you what arrogance looks like” / ...

In the livestream chat, viewers were just as excited as the netizens:

“Where are all the saints now? Should this kind of person be pitied?”

“Doesn’t her face hurt? Is the streamer going too far?”

“Shu Baoli, a disgusting person, should be knocked out with a volleyball!”

“Shu Baoli is bad, but it doesn’t mean the streamer is right. It’s still bullying, even if it’s Shu Baoli being bullied.”

“Hey, that saint earlier, go to hell [GIF]”

[GIF: I’ll show you off]

[GIF: Meteor from the sky]

…

At some point, viewers in the livestream also started sharing the GIF of An Cui hitting Shu Baoli with a volleyball. These GIFs were sent as messages in the livestream, which required a special payment. The ball would be targeted at specific accounts, creating a spectacular scene as the ball was sent to attack a particular comment.

The person being hit by so many balls probably felt the same way as Shu Baoli did.

Shu Baoli opened her computer and saw all the insults and these GIFs. Her face turned a rainbow of colors from anger, and she nearly vomited blood in frustration.

In her mind, neither she nor her mother had done anything wrong. As a famous person once said, in love, the one who is not loved is the third party, so her mother wasn’t a mistress, and she wasn’t an illegitimate child! She didn’t think there was anything shameful about it. However, now, the insults from netizens seemed to slap her face.

As the situation escalated, the Shu family was affected. The Lan family was a giant, and the netizens’ keyboard warriors couldn’t shake it, but the Shu family was different. Under the leadership of her father, who lacked business ability, the Shu family had been on a decline. Now that this disgusting family situation had been exposed, and with the Lan family offended, not many people in the industry were willing to cooperate with them. Just recently, two partners who were about to sign contracts called to cancel their deals.

Lan Shengzhe saw the news about Shu Baoli online and was stunned. After a while, he called Shu Baoli.

As soon as Shu Baoli picked up, she sobbed, “A-Zhe…”

But Lan Shengzhe’s voice was terrifyingly calm, “Is what’s online true?”

Shu Baoli instantly felt guilty and uneasy, “A-Zhe, wh-what happened? I just wanted to help you…”

“Your mother wasn’t the one being cheated on by a third party, she’s the third party, right?”

This was something Lan Shengzhe was supposed to learn about after many years. Shu Baoli, when she was little, knew how to talk to get benefits, so she lied to him to gain his friendship. After many years of emotional manipulation, he eventually learned the truth and finally cut ties with this toxic woman.

However, now, he had learned this in advance, and strangely, he didn’t even doubt it was false. In the original story, he had heard about Shu Baoli and her mother, but he always thought of them as victims and believed the original wife was the third party.

It was because he knew it was An Cui’s retaliation, and he subconsciously believed An Cui wouldn’t make up false information to fight back. After all, she was the type of person who would face everything openly and honestly.

Though Lan Shengzhe was an illegitimate child, his mother never asked the Lan family for money or tried to use him to enter high society. She had always worked hard to raise him on her own, so he believed his mother was innocent, not a homewrecker. Everything was the fault of that man. This was his pride, and because of this pride, if he had known earlier that Shu Baoli was truly an illegitimate child and her mother was the third party, he would never have bothered to be friends with her.

Shu Baoli didn’t expect Lan Shengzhe would bring this up. Her expression was filled with shock, and she nervously said, “A-Zhe… please let me explain…”

“You’re disgusting,” Lan Shengzhe coldly said, “From now on, you and I have nothing to do with each other. Stay away from me!” He hung up the phone, his heart filled with anger from being deceived.

An Cui’s image was never completely cleared, but when compared to the Shu family, her arrogance seemed refreshingly straightforward. Many people felt that with her family background, what was wrong with being arrogant? Who says that a wealthy family’s young lady must be elegant? Although some people criticized Shu Baoli as a slut, An Cui was still not a good person, yet she couldn’t stop the growing trend. Lan Shengmei’s Weibo quickly gained many more followers, soon surpassing Shu Baoli’s follower count.

While the Lan family waited to retaliate slowly and carefully, the Shu family was forced to react immediately. Shu Baoli posted an apology video, where the pale girl cried and said she was sorry, explaining that she had done it out of frustration, hoping people would forgive her due to her young age. She promised to study hard and never make the same mistake again… blabla…

Of course, she was mocked even more.

“You’re old enough to know better, yet you still say you’re too young to understand. No wonder you’re the product of two disgusting people!”

“She looks like the bizarre, white lotus mistress in some dramas.”

“Disgusts me so much, go to hell [GIF of An Cui hitting Shu Baoli with volleyball]”

…

Although she was still ridiculed, the apology video had some effect. At least men who saw her pathetic appearance hesitated to insult her, and other netizens gradually lost interest, since the apology was made and there were no more twists in the story.

The Lan family didn’t deal with the Shu family right away. It was better for them to suffer a slow decline. Shu Baoli, however, took a long leave from school, likely fearing being bullied.

The incident slowly subsided as there was no more drama to watch.

After watching for a while, He Yizhou finally found an opportunity to break up with An Cui. He sent her a message before school ended, asking to meet after class.

An Cui agreed.

After school, she walked out of the school gate with An Cui, and Lan Shengzhe sat in the car, following behind with the driver.

He Yizhou, however, felt a rare sense of nervousness. He looked at An Cui. Under the orange glow of the setting sun, her face resembled a close-up of a movie star from the 1930s—faintly yellow but delicate, every frame filled with an artistic quality, exuding a unique beauty.

Her waist was straight, and her chin was slightly raised. She walked with confidence, her clear, dark eyes reflecting arrogance and self-importance. Even the curve of her mouth seemed to be filled with pride and defiance.

He had to admit, An Cui was a very beautiful person. But someone who had been spoiled by her family, never suffered a single hardship, and enjoyed everything by right—someone who could act arrogantly without fear—was from a completely different world than him. Honestly, he found it very annoying, both disgusted and jealous.

"I want to say..." He Yizhou slowed his steps, looked at An Cui, and said, "We should break up. I've had enough. I've realized clearly that you weren't dating me because you liked me. You just wanted someone to do your bidding, and now, you have someone else who can do that for you, so you don't need me anymore. So, we should break up."

"Okay."

He Yizhou: "..." Is it really that simple? You really just wanted someone to command, didn’t you!

An Cui said, "If that's what you wanted to say, I understand. Thank you for everything you've done for me. Because of you, I’ve been able to relax."

He Yizhou was stunned. This... This was such a cold, heartless statement!! Not only did she admit to deceiving his feelings, but she also thanked him seriously. Damn you!! He wanted to send An Cui a meme of her slapping Shubali and send a lot of them!

System 524: "Cui Cui, how many people’s hatred are you trying to provoke? The male lead is bad enough, but you're not even sparing the second male lead!"

Thus, what he had thought would be at least a heartfelt if not tear-jerking breakup ended with such a simple conversation. Feeling depressed, He Yizhou parted ways with An Cui and went home.

An Cui also got into her car. Lan Shengzhe immediately asked, "What's wrong?"

"Nothing. Just a breakup," An Cui said calmly.

Lan Shengzhe was stunned, a sudden, inexplicable joy rising in his heart. A breakup? It was about time. He Yizhou was an unnecessary person. He could do everything He Yizhou did.

However, when they reached the city center, An Cui suddenly asked, "What day is it today?"

Lan Shengzhe answered.

An Cui furrowed her brows and asked the driver to turn around.

System 524: "Are you going to see the second male lead?"

"Yes."

"Why?" An Cui ignored him, and he had no choice but to sulk and shut his mouth.

As An Cui read through the original plot, she remembered that the reason the female lead truly won the second male lead's heart and made him open up to her was that she went to his house, only to find him being beaten by a man. When the man picked up a bottle to smash it on the second male lead's head, the female lead rushed to hold him, standing in front of him to take the blow herself.

Although He Yizhou appeared to be living a glamorous life, he had a father who took pleasure in domestic violence. The scariest part was that his father was as strong as a bear, and even most grown men couldn’t beat him.

Since he was a child, whenever his father came home drunk, he would beat people. Of course, it wasn’t the nanny or servants—he beat his mother and him. People say that a mother is strong for her child, but just like there are mothers who abandon their children, there are also mothers so weak that they can’t protect their own children. He Yizhou’s mother was one of those women. She had never protected him, and she even used him as a shield, locking herself in her room when his father came home.

He had silently endured it, planning to escape when he went to university, but before that, he had to keep enduring. After the nanny, the servants, and even his mother stood by and did nothing, he gradually stopped expecting anyone to rescue him. He thought the world was full of selfish and indifferent people. However, when the female lead rushed to protect him and got hurt, it still hit him like a hammer on his heart.

According to the rules, the female lead’s timely action was destined to change the course of fate. That is to say, without the female lead, the second male lead would have been struck on the head by the bottle and probably suffered a concussion, or worse, he might have died.

An Cui had no intention of developing a romantic storyline with He Yizhou, but after all, he had been working tirelessly for her. He had been used as a shield, suffering for her, so she at least had to do what the female lead should do after recalling this.

Of course, rushing out to shield He Yizhou was impossible.

So after the driver dropped her off at the door, she got out of the car, walked into the unlocked villa, and immediately kicked the man—who was cursing and looked like a mountain of meat—in the backside. The force was so great that the man staggered several steps forward and fell to the ground, unable to get up for a while.

He Yizhou was shocked, looking at the sudden appearance of An Cui.

An Cui walked up and began kicking the man on the ground, yelling, "Abusive man, big trash, eat shit."

The man struggled to get up, and An Cui immediately shouted, "Lan Shengzhe!"

The equally shocked Lan Shengzhe quickly stepped forward, using the awareness and tacit understanding developed after being dominated by her for days to pin the man down firmly so the young lady could kick him to her heart's content.

He Yizhou had never seen a scene like this before. The man, who seemed undefeatable, was now lying on the ground like a turtle, getting trampled, while the girl fiercely kicked him, her anger and fury shining in her eyes, her hair flying with every move. It was dazzling, from her furious expression to the movement of her hair.

Lan Shengzhe also watched An Cui, his heart stirred with emotions.

After kicking for a while, An Cui stopped to catch her breath.

The bodyguard, who had followed but hadn't been needed, cursed Lan Shengzhe for stealing his spotlight and quickly stepped forward to ask, "Miss, what should we do next?"

An Cui casually said, "Let him eat shit."

The bodyguard was stunned and showed a troubled expression. But in the end, he still put on a determined face and dragged the man toward the bathroom.

Lan Shengzhe: ??? Am I not enlightened enough???

He Yizhou: ??????

System 524: Holy shit!!!

...

The man, of course, did not eat shit. An Cui stopped the bodyguard before he could pull down his pants. After all, it was a bit too disgusting. But who knew the bodyguard would take her offhand comment so literally?

For this, An Cui decided to give him a raise. She liked people who listened so well.

So, Lan Shengzhe started looking at the bodyguard with strange eyes.

Although He Yizhou was now an adult, he was still no match for his bear-like father. His attempt at retaliation only led to a worse beating, with his father even losing his mind and trying to kill him.

His left wrist was fractured, his body covered in bruises, his face full of marks, and his mouth was bleeding. He looked horrible, but as long as his internal organs and brain were unharmed, it was already considered lucky.

Beating someone may feel satisfying in the moment, but the aftermath was simple. He Yizhou had thought it would be troublesome. Although his father was a jerk, he was also a self-made businessman with some power and connections. He wasn’t just some random man off the street.

However, An Cui made a phone call, and soon a team of lawyers arrived, all dressed in suits and exuding elite vibes. Not only did they eloquently speak, but they also investigated the man’s dirty deeds, leaving him with no chance to fight back.

The man, who had once haunted him like a nightmare and made him shiver at the mere thought of him, was now so weak and scared. He even looked at him with pleading eyes, looking so pathetic and ridiculous.

He looked at An Cui, who was casually playing a game on her phone. She was so nonchalant, as if this were just a matter of snapping her fingers. She was just like he had always thought—someone who had never suffered, spoiled by her family, and so arrogantly self-centered.

But the image of her fiercely kicking that man, cursing him out, had left a deep impression on his mind. From then on, she became a shining figure in his eyes. All her arrogance and domineering attitude seemed entirely justified.

She should be this way. She should be so proud and free.

His heart was a little out of control. He suddenly regretted the breakup he had proposed earlier.

Things quickly ended. He Yizhou signed a few documents, gaining part of the property from his scumbag father and holding leverage over him. As long as his father ever laid a hand on him again, he could make sure his father lost everything. Of course, if anything happened to him, the Lan family would help him make sure he had nothing.

"... Thank you," he said hoarsely, his eyes moist.

An Cui nodded. "Study hard, young man. Knowledge will become power. Although you won't be first in the school next time, second place is still okay."

He Yizhou: "..." She really knows how to kill the mood. And who are you to tell me that? You've barely been in the top 30 of the grade, sometimes even falling out of it. Before you went crazy, I believed you'd be burying yourself in books, but now you’re just doing what? Don't you remember the time you asked me to do your homework for you??

Unaware of He Yizhou’s inner complaints, An Cui got into the car with Lan Shengzhe and went home.

He Yizhou stood there, watching their car disappear for a long time. He turned and went inside to pack his things. His mother came in, stammering, hoping he would take her away.

He Yizhou simply responded with a bitter, sarcastic smile. The nannies were the ones who raised him, and his mother, overwhelmed by her own repression, took out her frustration on him. When he became strong enough to endure the blows, she pushed him out to be the shield. Even now, she still hides in her room, never stepping forward to protect him. She was pitiful for marrying such a bastard, but he was also pitiful for being born to her.

One's fate should be fought for by oneself, and he had been fighting for his. So, she should also fight for hers.

In the quiet car, Lan Shengzhe looked at An Cui, and for some reason, he felt a strange sensation in his heart—something sour and swelling. He felt as though he was jealous of He Yizhou, yet he also felt happy for him. It was a strange feeling.



============================================================

Chapter 24: Arrogant and Overbearing Young Lady 15

The news of An Cui and He Yizhou breaking up quickly spread throughout the school, and the girls who liked He Yizhou were immediately delighted. As for the boys, there wasn’t much of a reaction. An Cui’s brilliance was too dazzling, and very few boys had the courage to approach her. Even if they liked her, they only dared to secretly admire her in their hearts, fearing they would be mocked for trying to reach beyond their means.

To pursue someone like An Cui, one not only needed to have a comparable family background, but also enough confidence and courage.

In the entire school, only one person immediately gathered the courage.

As An Cui ascended to the second floor, she saw a meal and a cup of milk tea placed in front of her seat. She looked up at An Ran, who was lounging on a single sofa, looking effortlessly casual. The handsome boy reclined on the sofa, one leg propped on the armrest, the other lazily stretched out. He was tapping away on his phone, as though the meal wasn’t something he had ordered.

If not for his ears turning bright red and his fingers absentmindedly tapping on the phone, making it produce the “Miss, Miss” sound, it would have been hard to tell.

An Cui raised her eyebrows, walked over, and pushed the meal and milk tea toward him. “You’re taking my seat.”

In an instant, the redness from his ears spread to his cheeks. An Ran immediately straightened up. “Senior, are you an idiot? This is for you.”

“Oh, how would I know it’s for me if you didn’t say?” An Cui teased him.

“So you are an idiot,” An Ran mumbled, then quickly sat beside An Cui, eagerly handing her the milk tea. “Here.”

“Thanks,” An Cui accepted the gesture and started eating.

An Ran took the opportunity to strike while the iron was hot. “Senior, you broke up with He Yizhou?”

An Cui didn’t feel like answering, but An Ran wasn’t deterred. He immediately added, “Then, can I be your boyfriend?”

!!! Lan Shuhua and the others widened their eyes, staring at them without saying a word.

“No,” An Cui didn’t even look up.

An Ran immediately pouted in dissatisfaction, leaning closer, now practically pressing against An Cui’s shoulder. “Why not? If He Yizhou could be your boyfriend, why can’t I? I can do the things he did, and the things he can’t do, I can do those too.”

An Cui paused for a moment, turned her head, and looked at An Ran’s handsome face. Her brows slowly lifted, then lowered.

An Ran’s expression froze, but he quickly forced a calm smile. “If you want to check whether I have potential, we can go to the bathroom…”

An Cui stopped joking with him, pushing his head away. “Behave, little one. Move aside and don’t disturb your sister while she eats.”

The starry light in An Ran’s eyes dimmed a bit, but it quickly brightened again. He stayed beside An Cui without leaving.

So, when Lan Shengzhe came in with the meal, it was just like when He Yizhou came in before. He saw that An Cui was already having lunch, being served by someone else.

Lan Shengzhe: “…”

“Sister, you’re already eating?” Lan Shengzhe walked over, a little hurt. He then realized that this line sounded a bit familiar.

“Mm.”

“What about this one?”

An Ran said, “Give it to me, I can eat it.”

Lan Shengzhe: “…” I just want to throw this food at your face, you jerk. Don’t think I don’t know what you’re up to. Shameless.

History always seems to repeat itself. Just as Lan Shengzhe tried to take He Yizhou’s “job,” An Ran did the same with Lan Shengzhe’s “job.” The difference was that everyone knew Lan Shengzhe was trying to please An Cui, while now, everyone knew An Ran was pursuing An Cui.

And unlike He Yizhou, An Ran’s pursuit was effortless. An Ran was in the same grade and class as Lan Shengzhe, and he controlled the first year. As long as he didn’t let Lan Shengzhe leave this territory, Lan Shengzhe couldn’t escape. So, it was easy for An Ran to take Lan Shengzhe’s “job.”

After An Cui suddenly got her period and texted Lan Shengzhe to buy sanitary pads from the school store, it turned out that An Ran was the one who brought them, his ears red. Later, after An Cui finished washing her hands and exited the girls’ restroom, she stood in front of him with her arms crossed.

An Ran was only 15 years old, not yet at his developmental peak, but already 1.7 meters tall. His arms, shaped by frequent basketball games, had beautifully defined muscles, both flexible and explosive. At this rate, it seemed certain he would surpass 1.8 meters in the future. An Cui, who was set at 1.67 meters, seemed a little shorter in front of him, but her strong aura made her appear much taller. It was clearly the older sister and younger brother dynamic.

“You’re so idle,” An Cui asked.

An Ran immediately leaned in, his handsome face shining with what seemed like stars in his eyes. “I want to be your boyfriend.”

“I don’t like little boys.”

“I’m not a little boy, I’m just two years younger than you,” An Ran said, slightly annoyed.

Good-looking people really make it hard to stay mad at them. An Cui thought he was kind of cute and smiled as she patted his head. “You’re still a little one. How about this? You can be my little brother.”

An Ran seized the opportunity, grabbing her hand and shamelessly climbing up. Sweetly, he asked, “So, if I’m your little brother now, can I be your husband in the future?”

An Cui smiled and said, “We’ll see.”

An Ran’s eyes suddenly brightened like stars: “Does this mean I’ve got the number for love? Yay! Senior, I love you!!”

This little episode between An Cui and An Ran quickly spread throughout the school and soon became a gossip sensation. It was quickly turned into, “An Ran confessed, and An Cui accepted. They are now in a relationship.”

The girls who liked An Ran were furious. However, no matter how angry they were, they only dared to secretly glare at An Cui, wanting to eliminate her but unable to do so.

The school bell rang, and An Cui was still lounging in her chair playing a game. On the blackboard in front, the name of the person on duty was written at the lower left corner. The words “Lan Shengmei” were neatly written there.

But of course, An Cui wasn’t going to sweep or mop the floor.

So, she continued playing, while Lan Shengzhe bent down to do her duties. The classmates had gotten used to Lan Shengzhe’s presence and didn’t find it strange. It was better to have someone clean than An Cui simply walking away and leaving the work to them. What surprised them was that An Cui was actually waiting for Lan Shengzhe. She used to just leave him behind to do the duties.

The relationship between Lan Shengzhe and An Cui had clearly changed. Others could feel it from the way Lan Shengzhe treated An Cui. He affectionately called her “sister,” his smile growing brighter, and his eyes shining as if all the gloom had disappeared. His body also visibly grew stronger, and soon his handsome features began to show. The classmates were surprised to see how good-looking he was.

An Cui’s attitude toward him also seemed to have slightly changed. Their conversations had increased. Before, Lan Shengzhe would always follow her, and An Cui would ignore him, responding only occasionally when she was in a good mood. Now, it seemed like the ice was starting to melt. Like right now, she was actually waiting for him. In the past, she would have just left him to do the duties.

“…Sister, lift your foot,” Lan Shengzhe said, his tone slightly cold.

An Cui didn’t take her eyes off the screen and raised her foot. “Hurry up, I’m hungry.”

“Oh.OK”

Here is the translation of your text into English:

The familiar tone was subtly different from before, yet Blue Shengzhe didn’t feel particularly happy. He felt irritated. When the rumors about An Cui and An Ran being involved reached his ears, he became very agitated. An Ran, after He Yizhou left, now there’s another An Ran—this is really annoying. But why he felt so irritated, Blue Shengzhe himself didn’t know.

He thought about it, and another shadow surfaced in his mind.

He remembered that day. An Cui had gone to play volleyball, and he was standing on the sidelines, holding her phone and towel. Suddenly, An Cui’s phone vibrated—it was a message from He Yizhou.

"Shengmei, I’ve thought it over, and I still think it’s better to tell you. I hope you don’t think I’m meddling. Your half-brother isn’t as simple as he appears. He’s just pretending. He’s strategizing to use you. Have you noticed that the bad rumors about him in school have gradually disappeared? He’s a wolf in sheep’s clothing. I don’t want you to get hurt, so please stay vigilant around him."

He coldly looked at the message and then raised his eyes to watch the girl in the field, jumping to send the ball with her racket. With a light tap of his finger, he deleted the message.

He Yizhou had done a lot for An Cui. For a boy of his age, it was a bit too much of a favor. Even though he was grateful, he didn’t feel comfortable going in front of her, so after sending the message, even if he didn’t receive a reply, he couldn’t bring himself to go to An Cui.

But he didn’t know if He Yizhou would one day come to An Cui again, saying things to her. It was so annoying—what business was it of his? What did my sister’s and my relationship have to do with you?

When Blue Shengzhe returned after taking out the trash, An Cui had put away her phone and was heading outside. He grabbed her backpack and followed.

He couldn’t help but ask, “Sister, are you really dating An Ran?”

An Cui glanced at him, “No.”

Blue Shengzhe instantly felt happy, “So you rejected him?”

“You’re annoying.” An Cui said impatiently, feeling bothered by his constant questions.

Blue Shengzhe was used to An Cui’s temper and didn’t think much of it. In fact, he was quite happy.

Then they met An Ran at the school gate.

An Ran stood there with his group of friends by the school gate. As soon as An Cui and Blue Shengzhe arrived, all the eyes turned to them. To those who didn’t know, they looked like a group of troublemakers ready to harass An Cui. Even An Cui’s driver and bodyguard, waiting by the gate, got out of the car, ready to protect the young lady at any moment.

But An Ran showed a sweet smile on his face, walking towards them with quick steps and said, “Senior, I’ll take you home.”

Blue Shengzhe’s eyes darkened—what a shameless guy. He had already been rejected, yet he was still coming over.

“My car and driver are waiting for me. You don’t need to send me.” An Cui said.

“Your car and driver sending you is no different from me sending you. It’s still taking you home.” An Ran said, reaching out to pull An Cui away.

An Cui took two steps, and her other hand was grabbed—by Blue Shengzhe.

Blue Shengzhe tightly held An Cui’s other hand, looking at An Ran with a gloomy expression, and spoke as calmly as usual, “Didn’t you hear my sister say she doesn’t need you to send her?”

An Ran looked at him sarcastically, “A lapdog shouldn’t interfere in the matters of the owner.”

Blue Shengzhe tightened his grip on An Cui’s hand, not letting go.

“Enough.” An Cui said, then asked An Ran, “What car do you have?”

Following An Ran’s gaze, they saw his heavy-duty motorcycle. It seemed young people liked these kinds of bikes.

“Give me the keys.”

An Ran: “?”

Blue Shengzhe: “…”

A few minutes later.

The motorcycle sped down the road, swiftly and safely weaving between cars. An Cui, sitting in the front, smiled slightly at the corner of her mouth. It seemed like this bike might become her new favorite. Behind her, two boys sat close, head to head, with their faces blank beneath their helmets.

524: 【……】

An Cui drove the bike, took An Ran back home, returned the bike to him, and then took Blue Shengzhe back to her car to go home.

An Ran stood there, expressionless for a long time. Gradually, his face began to show emotion. He slammed his helmet to the ground, “What the hell! Huh??”

That night, while brushing his teeth, An Ran was so angry that he almost crushed the toothpaste tube, and the next morning, he jumped out of bed, dressed quickly, ate breakfast, and rushed out the door.

The An family and the Blue family were known as the two giants. At this moment, the young master of the An family was already waiting early at the door. Ignoring him seemed impossible, but inviting him inside was also rejected, so he had no choice but to go upstairs to call the young lady.

An Cui was a bit surprised when she heard that An Ran had come again. She had thought that after two rejections, he would have given up. She didn’t want to bother with him, but when she looked out the window, she saw something unbelievable.

It had already entered winter, and the Blue family’s estate was in the suburbs. In the morning, fog filled the air, and the temperature was damp and cold. At this time, if a handsome young man stood there in thin clothing, with a red nose from the cold, it would certainly be heart-wrenching. However, An Ran wore a hoodie over his school uniform, looking especially warm, with an air of someone who really knew how to take care of himself.

An Cui sent someone to bring him in. When An Ran heard it was An Cui’s instruction, he finally came in.

An Cui came downstairs and asked, “Came so early, did you have breakfast?”

“I ate. I’m not a kid who can’t take care of myself.” An Ran looked at her with a “don’t underestimate me” expression. Remembering yesterday’s events, he still felt awkward, “If you haven’t eaten, go eat quickly. Afterward, I’ll take you to school. Just you though, not Blue Shengzhe!”

“Are you still not giving up after being rejected?” An Cui laughed, looking at him. He was so naive, not knowing how to pursue someone, and all he thought about was sending people to and from school every day.

“Hmph.”

An Ran had been rejected but still acted like a puppy, circling around An Cui. No matter how much he was mocked, he would only get angry and then silently act as if nothing had happened, returning to offer his servitude again.

Since An Ran moved closer to An Cui, his group of friends also gathered around her, making her the center of attention in what felt like a real-life campus romance story for other girls.

At this point, it seemed like all the top students from the whole school were orbiting around An Cui.

Some people hated this and gritted their teeth, but they couldn’t do anything about it. They could only hope that the upcoming midterm exam would make An Cui fall hard. It was probably because her image of being spoiled and domineering had become too ingrained in people’s minds that many assumed she hadn’t been studying. After all, what kind of teenager, especially one affected by such a family scandal, would not have a dramatic drop in grades?

Although the school was an elite institution, it was a first-rate school, and academics were taken very seriously. The classes were also ranked by performance. No matter how arrogant An Cui had been lately, what would happen if she were kicked out of class 1 after the exam? That would be embarrassing. Even if she could stay in class 1 because of family connections, it would only make people look down on her more.

With these malicious thoughts in mind, the midterm exam arrived, and after it ended, the results came out.

“Quick, quick, quick, let’s see what rank Blue Shengmei is. Look from number 100 upwards.”

“Where is it, where is it?”

One by one, they looked at the names, and they kept scrolling until they reached the 31st position of the last exam, where Lan Shengmei was ranked, but they didn’t continue looking. They cheered.

“Out of the top 100!!!”

“Hahahaha, serves her right! Let her be arrogant and let her flaunt it!”

Several girls gathered together, chattering happily, but they didn’t notice that the classmates around them were staring at them with strange looks. It wasn’t until someone tapped them on the shoulder and said, “Look at the first place.”

Instinctively, they glanced upward at the voice, and their smiles froze.

Rank Name

1 Lan Shengmei
2 He Yizhou

Aside from a few points deducted in the essay section of the humanities exam, full marks in all subjects!

Anyone who had paid attention to An Cui was shocked. Wasn’t she supposed to be a rebellious girl with bad grades? Why did her grades not drop but instead increase, jumping from 30th in the class to first place all of a sudden!!

In fact, it wasn’t a particularly miraculous thing to go from 30th in the class to first place, but when An Cui did it, it seemed so unbelievable. Look at her domineering attitude. Does she look like someone who could sit at a desk and study?

But the fact was, An Cui was ranked first, surpassing He Yizhou by more than twenty points. Even claiming that she cheated wouldn’t hold water.

He Yizhou sat at his desk, staring at the transcript, his mind filled with thoughts... so An Cui wasn’t just boasting after all…

It wasn’t clear who uploaded the transcript online, but it quickly went viral, especially after the previous bullying incident, with gifs and memes spreading around to keep the heat going. Once this was posted, it quickly made it to the trending searches, and the netizens were stunned:

【I never expected, the young lady is actually a top student!】

【Oh my god, impressive, with these grades, she could get into a top-tier university!】

【I thought she was an ignorant rich girl, didn’t know she’s a top student after all】

【Maybe she cheated】

【So rich, and the Lan family is one of the investors in the school, knowing about the exam papers in advance...】

【So sour upstairs! The young lady from the Lan family is a top student. Her grades have always been good, it’s just that this time she did exceptionally well】

【...】

Shu Baoli, who had taken a long leave and hadn’t been to school, read these comments online, and hatred filled her face, her malice almost visible in her eyes.

Now An Cui had completely cleared her name. No one cared anymore about how An Cui had once bullied others at school. She had stepped on others to climb to the top and became a famous and well-liked young lady online. Meanwhile, she was being condemned by everyone, and even Lan Shengzhe had severed ties with her, blocking her...

It was so hateful, this person was just so hateful!

At this moment, her phone vibrated.

Another message came from that unknown number:

【Do you want revenge?】

Shu Baoli's face turned cold, and she immediately dialed the number. After a while, the call was answered, and she sarcastically said, “What’s this? I thought you wouldn’t dare answer.”

A woman’s voice came from the other side, “What am I afraid of? The enemy of my enemy is my friend. We both hate Lan Shengmei. I think we can be friends.”

“You’re full of crap. You just want to use me. You’re too afraid to fight with Lan Shengmei yourself, and now you want to use me as a pawn?”

“So what? The Shu family will go bankrupt in two months, and you offended the Lan family. Do you think you’ll end up any better? Since the outcome can’t be changed, what are you afraid of losing? You do the work, and I’ll support you from behind. If things get exposed, I’m still fine, and I can even give you some benefits.” The voice on the other side was full of contempt.

This made Shu Baoli so angry that her chest was heaving, but she couldn’t refute immediately because the other person had a point.

“... Fine, fine, what do you want me to do?”

...

An Cui finally realized that the milk tea recently was always hot, and the food was no longer served in the school’s plates but in insulated lunch boxes.

She looked at An Ran in surprise. An Ran, who was sipping the milk tea unhappily, didn’t look like the type who would take care of others, but surprisingly, he could take care of both himself and others.

“What are you staring at? Keep staring and I’ll eat you up.” An Ran said viciously, showing his teeth.

“Why do you look so unhappy?”

An Ran snorted but didn’t answer.

An Cui ignored him.

A moment later, An Ran leaned in and said coquettishly, “Senior, don’t look down on me. I’ll catch up to you soon.”

An Cui immediately reacted, “What rank did you get?”

An Ran’s ears turned red instantly.

Lan Shuhua’s sarcastic voice floated over, “Always at the bottom…”

An Ran immediately glared at her with a murderous look, his face flushed. He had never cared about grades before, attending classes casually, reading books casually, and taking exams carelessly. He had always been a bad student, and never expected to regret not studying well. Historically, top students and bad students don’t get along... how infuriating!

Lan Shengzhe, who ranked in the top 30 and was about to transfer to a better class, looked at him with mocking eyes.

“I told you, I’ll catch up soon!” An Ran looked at An Cui, both fierce and cute, “Don’t look down on me, senior!”

“Okay.”

“By the way, it’s my birthday tonight.”

An Cui: “Okay.”

“What’s with the ‘okay’? Celebrate with me, I’m 16!!”

Because of An Ran’s strong request, An Cui was somewhat lenient with him and decided to take him and Lan Shengzhe to his birthday party that night.

An Ran’s birthday party was set at the Royal Court Club, a high-end venue only the wealthy could afford.

Before entering the private room, Lan Shengzhe accidentally saw Shu Baoli walking around the corner. His brows immediately furrowed, and unease filled his heart. He then said to An Cui, “Sister, I’ll go to the bathroom.”

“Mm.”

Lan Shengzhe found Shu Baoli around the corner. It seemed she had been waiting for him on purpose.

“What are you doing here?” Lan Shengzhe asked expressionlessly.

Shu Baoli looked at him, her eyes immediately reddening, “Is this really what you want to say to me? After all this time, when you see me, you just want to ask this? What am I doing here?”

Her voice trembled, her gaze so sad that Lan Shengzhe immediately looked away, not wanting to look at her, “Don’t try this with me.”

“Don’t try this with you? We grew up together, I wasn’t sincere with anyone, but I was genuinely good to you. Can’t you feel that? Are you really going to treat me so coldly?”

Face to face, it was different than talking on the phone. Lan Shengzhe’s young heart wasn’t yet hardened. Even though he despised Shu Baoli’s deceit, her words reminded him of the past, and it was impossible not to feel some sympathy for her.

He took a deep breath, “At this point, don’t say this anymore. I can’t be friends with you anymore. You’d better leave here. If my sister sees you, she won’t let you go.”

Shu Baoli smiled sarcastically, “You say ‘sister’ so smoothly. Have you already forgotten how your mother died? Have you forgotten your revenge? Now you’ve been completely tamed by her, just like a dog?”

Lan Shengzhe was furious: “What nonsense are you spouting?! I know exactly what I’m doing, I don’t need you to point fingers! Leave now, or I’ll tell her you’re here, and I won’t take responsibility for what happens next.”

Lan Shengzhe turned and left, hearing Shu Baoli crying behind him: “Fine, tell her! Let her kill me, I’ve lost everything anyway!”

Lan Shengzhe’s heart froze for a moment, but he didn’t stop and returned to the private room.

An Cui was playing games with An Ran and the others. An Ran was sitting next to her, and the seat on the other side was empty.

A group of people were sitting around, playing a card game on the table.

“Come on, come join us.” A lively classmate waved at Lan Shengzhe.

Lan Shengzhe sat down in the empty seat next to An Cui, and the game started. He looked at the card he drew; it wasn’t a joker, and he wasn’t the king. He wasn’t very focused. He wondered if Shu Baoli’s presence here had something to do with An Cui. Or was she just here to socialize with family members? He wasn’t sure and hesitated whether he should tell An Cui about seeing Shu Baoli here.

Many viewers in the live stream screamed:

【Come on, say it! Otherwise, with our host's personality, you're done for!】

【Don’t keep testing the waters on the edge of danger! Shu Baoli isn’t worth it!】

【I’ve started to like the male lead, don’t mess it up...】

【...】

==========================================================


Chapter 25: The Arrogant Young Lady (End)

In the first round, the players who drew the Joker card and the holders of the numbered cards were all strangers. For An Ran's birthday, all the invited guests were his good friends, some from the same school and some from others. Because An Ran was the central figure, everyone, whether familiar or not, quickly blended together and had a lot of fun.

Some were ordered to hug the person holding a certain number, others were told to go out and confess to the first person they met, and there were even some commanded to kiss someone whose number was specified...

An Cui, Lan Shengzhe, and An Ran all managed to avoid it.

"Alright, let’s see who’s next."

"Hahaha, I’m the Joker, I’m the king. Okay, then I order... Number 2 and Number 7 to French kiss for one minute!"

Number 2?

An Cui glanced at her card: Spades 2.

When An Cui revealed her card, the room went silent for a moment before it erupted in excitement. Who was number 7? Who was number 7?

"Number 7, number 7, stop stalling, show your card!"

Lan Shengzhe casually looked at his card, but his wandering thoughts quickly returned. His heartbeat accelerated as he nervously revealed his card.

Wow!!!!

Everyone was shocked!!! The boys and girls were stunned, and the atmosphere became a little awkward. Who didn’t know that An Cui and Lan Shengzhe were siblings, and not only that, she was the legitimate daughter and he was the illegitimate son. However, there were some emotionally intelligent people present who quickly intervened, saying, "This doesn’t count, let’s redo it."

So, they reshuffled the cards and drew again. This time, the king excitedly ordered: "Number 6 and Number 4 to French kiss for one minute!"

An Cui looked at her card: Diamond 6. "..."

524: ...Looks like bad luck is unstoppable.

They saw it was An Cui again, and they were shocked. Then, they looked toward Lan Shengzhe, but unexpectedly, An Ran proudly revealed his card.

Hearts 4!

The fun of the King’s Game lies in its compulsive nature—those who are ordered to do something cannot refuse unless there are special circumstances, or else the game wouldn’t be fun. They had already canceled one round, so there was no reason to cancel this time.

However, everyone thought, considering the young lady's temper, if she didn’t want to do it, who would dare say anything? Still, everyone had some doubts, thinking she might spoil the fun.

But no one expected that An Cui would throw down her card, turn, and grab An Ran’s shoulder, planting her red lips on him.

An Ran hadn’t expected that An Cui wouldn’t even hesitate, and instantly froze, his eyes wide open. An Cui’s eyelashes were so close to his face that they almost brushed his eyeballs, making his eyelids tremble. But it seemed like his male instincts kicked in, and he quickly shut his eyes.

The soft lips tangled and sucked, making the girls watching cover their faces, while the boys were stirred.

Lan Shengzhe, however, felt irritated, finding the close-up scene so disturbing that he hated it. He didn't like it, not at all. Why didn’t he like it? He didn’t know.

One minute seemed to pass quickly but slowly at the same time. An Cui felt her tongue becoming numb from the sucking and made a gesture to end it. However, An Ran, like a little dog, moved closer and sucked her lips again before they parted. She looked at him, and the delicate, handsome young man smiled shyly at her, looking so innocent, as if the one who had just stirred things up in her mouth wasn’t him.

Alright, the game continued.

After playing for a while and drinking some alcohol, An Cui felt a bit hot and got up to go to the bathroom. Lan Shengzhe instinctively followed her, but An Cui scolded him and he returned to sit down.

Since everyone was in the private room, the hallway was mostly empty unless someone was smoking or going to the bathroom.

On her way to the bathroom, An Cui saw a few men standing outside a private room smoking. They glanced at her and whispered something to each other.

An Cui looked away and entered the bathroom to take care of her needs. When she came out and washed her hands, she found that the men had disappeared.

Furrowing her brow, An Cui looked around, but just as she passed by another room, the door suddenly opened, and a hand reached out and grabbed her, pulling her into the room.

On An Ran’s side, someone had just turned the corner and saw this scene. Scared, he held it in and quickly ran back into the room.

"Not good, I saw a few men drag the young lady into a private room!" he immediately told his friends.

Those still joking around froze, then immediately jumped out of their seats. Damn, who has the guts to do this?

An Ran and Lan Shengzhe ran the fastest, following the friend who had seen it, and when they entered the room, they saw several men surrounding An Cui, tearing at her. It made them furious.

An Cui had some fighting skills. When she was first pulled in, she had thought about beating them up, but remembering that the role of Lan Shengmei wouldn’t likely know such skills, and noticing the boy’s arrival, she decided to play weak. Based on the situation, it seemed to be working well.

"I'll fuck you up!!" An Ran kicked one of them.

Lan Shengzhe rushed over and knocked a man away. "Sister!!"

The room erupted into chaos, and even Lan Shuhua joined in, throwing punches and kicks. "How dare you lay a hand on our young lady? If Grandpa and Grandma find out, they'll definitely blame me! I'll beat the shit out of you!!"

Soon, those men were beaten to the ground, curled up in a pile. The manager and security arrived.

Shu Baoli stood at the edge of the crowd, looking at the men who had been caught, and An Cui, who seemed unharmed. Her face darkened.

What’s going on? Is Lan Shengmei really that lucky?!! Damn it! Afraid of being found out, Shu Baoli quickly turned and left.

The police arrived soon after, taking the men away. With such an incident, the party naturally couldn’t continue, so An Cui left with Lan Shengzhe, her face dark.

Before leaving, Lan Shengzhe turned to look for Shu Baoli but couldn’t find her. However, he was sure that it was her doing.

Since Lan Shuhua also attended the party, when they arrived home, the family already knew about the incident where An Cui had almost been bullied. Grandparents were so furious they nearly showed their intention to kill those men on the spot.

Even so, they became even more careful around An Cui, but she acted as though nothing had happened, instead comforting her grandparents, making them so touched and heartbroken that they were on the verge of tears, while also scolding Lan Shengzhe: “Always around, but where were you when it mattered?”

Lan Shengzhe lowered his head, and An Cui spoke on his behalf: “I went to the bathroom. Why should he follow me?”

“My dear...”

After comforting the two elders, An Cui went upstairs. Lan Shengzhe followed her all the way to her door. “You… you really alright?”

“I’m fine.”

“Why don’t I stay outside your door tonight and guard for you?” Lan Shengzhe said, his throat bobbing, several times almost telling her about Shu Baoli’s incident at the club, thinking it might be her arrangement, but he hesitated each time and swallowed it.

Before he had kicked open the VIP room door, he did briefly want to kill Shu Baoli, but now, with his hot blood cooling down, he became somewhat indecisive. He couldn’t be sure if it was really Shu Baoli because he had no evidence, and if he wronged her, then... her life would be over.

“What? Do you think I’m that fragile in your eyes?” An Cui seemed amused, smiling at him.

It was the first time An Cui had genuinely smiled at him, not a sneer, a mockery, a cold smile, or a fake grin, but a real smile, like a thorny red rose blooming, which stunned him in an instant, his mind lost.

What was even more unbelievable was that An Cui reached out and rubbed his head, as if a bit spoiled, almost like petting a cute puppy.

He stood there, motionless, staring at her door, still immersed in that smile and that intimate touch, his heart swelling up like an inflated balloon, floating up. He took a long time to return to his room, and when he looked in the bathroom mirror, he saw a smile on his face that even he didn’t realize was there.

He stared at it, suddenly forcing the corners of his mouth down, then quickly turned on the faucet and splashed cold water on his face. He took a deep breath. “Very good, very good,” he thought. “I’ve already taken her step by step. An Cui is my enemy, the one I want to take revenge on. Everything I’ve done to her is for this purpose. There’s nothing else.”

That night, Lan Shengzhe had a dream.

He dreamed of An Cui, her smiling at him, embracing him, and kissing him. Their lips intertwined, tongues mingled, kissing for a long, long time…

As the daylight poured into the bedroom, Lan Shengzhe rubbed his pillow, waking up. As his mind cleared, his face suddenly darkened. He threw off the blanket and jumped out of bed, rushing to the bathroom.

He was horrified, feeling like he had gone crazy. How could he have such a dream? Him? An Cui? What the hell? It must have been because of her kiss with An Ran yesterday that triggered it. It had to be… damn it! How could he dream this… it was just… “disgusting,” but the word wouldn’t come out.

For a moment, Lan Shengzhe couldn’t face An Cui. Fortunately, it was Saturday, so he didn’t have to go to class, and An Cui was still asleep. He didn’t need to follow her, so he decided to go out for some fresh air.

Because of his increasingly close relationship with An Cui, Lan Shengzhe could ask the family’s driver to take him out, so he was quickly dropped off in the city center.

Lan Shengzhe wandered aimlessly, and while he wasn’t paying attention, he bumped into a shabby man.

“Sorry.” Lan Shengzhe quickly reached out to help the man, apologized, and walked away.

He didn’t notice that the man turned to stare at him for a long time before quietly following him.

Lan Shengzhe wandered outside for a long time before finally heading back home. Upon his return, he discovered that Lan Shengmei had gone out. After asking the butler, he learned that it was An Ran who had come to pick her up.

An Cui and An Ran had gone out. Thinking of their kiss last night, An Ran was already pursuing An Cui, showing no restraint in his affection for her, and An Cui seemed particularly tolerant of him. After the ambiguous kiss yesterday, they had gone out today... It seemed very likely they were dating. Lan Shengzhe felt as though his chest was blocked by a lump of cotton, and his breathing became difficult.

Although he had previously been unable to face An Cui, at that moment, he immediately took out his phone to call her, wanting to ask where she was, but no one answered. He tried several times, but there was still no answer, so he texted her, but no reply came either.

He could only sit in his room, waiting anxiously for An Cui to return.

Finally, around 9 p.m., An Cui returned.

When Lan Shengzhe heard the sound, he immediately rushed to An Cui’s room. He was eager to see her and find out what happened today between her and An Ran. Were they now in a relationship?

An Cui opened the door and glanced at him without expression, letting him in.

The words Lan Shengzhe was about to speak got stuck in his throat, and suddenly, he felt uneasy. He followed her inside.

“The matter from last night has been investigated,” An Cui said, walking to the desk and picking up a small stack of papers.

Lan Shengzhe quickly asked, “Really? What happened?”

“Someone paid to hire thugs to target me. Can you guess who it was?”

An Cui’s words made Lan Shengzhe’s anxiety grow. “...Who?”

“Shu Baoli.”

The axe that had been hanging over his head finally dropped, and Lan Shengzhe actually felt a sense of relief. “Really? Is this the evidence? Can I see it?”

An Cui looked at him and smiled, but it was a fake smile, which made Lan Shengzhe’s heart tighten.

An Cui handed him the stack of papers. Lan Shengzhe took it and quickly looked down. His limbs grew cold, and soon, his entire body was frozen as he stood still.

What he saw was not evidence of Shu Baoli hiring thugs, but his own personal information, so detailed that even his relationship with Shu Baoli and their friendship was laid bare. There were even photos…

He was already struggling to think, his mind filled with nothing but the thought that it was over. He didn’t even dare to look up at An Cui.

However, as much as he wanted to escape, An Cui wouldn’t let him.

"Do you have anything else to say?" An Cui was holding her shiny black whip in her hand, though he didn’t know exactly when she had gotten it.

Lan Shengzhe looked at her with a hint of terror. "Sister..."

"Shut up!" An Cui swung the whip violently, striking him. "Who do you think you are, calling me that?"

Lan Shengzhe felt as though the whip had pierced through his skin and flesh, landing directly on his heart, causing an overwhelming pain.

He was terrified of that whip. As he watched her raise her hand again, he couldn’t help but close his eyes tightly, bracing for the next strike.

However, the whip never came down. He opened his eyes and saw An Cui staring at him, her eyes filled with utter disdain, coldness, and disappointment. "Birds of a feather flock together."

Lan Shengzhe felt as though her gaze, her cold words, were like a giant axe, splitting his heart in half.

A wave of panic surged through his chest. "Sister... sister..."

"Leave." An Cui put down the whip and spoke.

"No! You hit me! I was wrong, sister, please hit me!" Lan Shengzhe panicked, running toward her, taking the whip from her hand and trying to push it back into her grasp. He would rather be struck by her harshly than hear her speak those words so coldly, because it felt like she no longer wanted him. "Don’t drive me away. Hit me, hit me..."

But no matter how much he begged, An Cui simply coldly said, "Get lost."

Lan Shengzhe was sent away, as he was thought to have worked with Shu Baoli to harm An Cui. He was no longer allowed to stay at the Lan family’s estate. However, since he was still a member of the Lan family, they couldn’t just discard him. He was instead made to stay in an apartment near the school, receiving a small amount of living expenses regularly, and then left to fend for himself.

Lan Shengzhe didn’t go to school. He locked himself in his apartment for several days, but he wasn’t completely oblivious to the outside world. He knew that the Shu family had officially gone bankrupt, and Shu Baoli had been sued by An Cui. Also sued alongside her was a girl named "Lv Xiaojie," both of whom were over 15 years old and would have to face criminal charges, meaning prison was on the horizon.

He already knew that Lv Xiaojie was the one who had conspired with Shu Baoli to harm An Cui. An Cui had once shoved a dead rat into her mouth, and since then, she had harbored a grudge, seeking revenge on An Cui, but ultimately, she had failed.

She deserved it.

Lan Shengzhe thought, unsure whether he was laughing at Lv Xiaojie or at himself.

He shut himself in his apartment, feeling as though he had lost his dreams, lost all motivation. Even thinking of his deceased mother couldn’t lift his spirits. Every day, he dreamt of returning to An Ran’s birthday. As soon as he saw Shu Baoli, he would go straight to An Cui and warn her, allowing her to be cautious. Then, nothing would have happened that day. Later, An Cui would learn that he had once been friends with Shu Baoli, and she would understand that he had been deceived. Though she would be angry and lash out at him, she would forgive him...

Then he would wake up joyfully, only to face the cruel reality.

He had been kicked out, and An Cui didn’t believe him. She had said he was like Shu Baoli: "Birds of a feather flock together."

An Cui was told that Lan Shengzhe had been admitted to the hospital. His neighbor had come back to find his apartment door wide open, and fearing a burglary, they had tried to close it. However, they found Lan Shengzhe lying unconscious on the floor and called an ambulance for him.

Lan Shengzhe had starved himself until he fainted, and when he collapsed, he had apparently injured his leg, fracturing his shin. It seemed like being thrown out of the Lan family had been a huge blow to him, and he had given up on everything.

An Cui merely glanced at the message and showed no other sign of reaction.

Lan Shengzhe waited in the hospital, waiting for his cheap father’s hired nurse to show up, waiting for Lan Shuhua and the others to come and laugh at him, but he never saw An Cui.

Winter had come. Lan Shengzhe sat in a wheelchair, covered with a blanket, pushed by the nurse. The cold wind sliced through his respiratory system, but all he felt was that the wind cut straight through his chest and pierced his heart.

He couldn’t eat, but he hadn’t meant to starve himself. He had purposely left the door open so that someone would take him to the hospital. He had hoped that by seeing him like this, An Cui might feel a sliver of pity, that she would look at him, but she didn’t.

She was truly heartless.

The nurse was a strong, middle-aged woman. Seeing the pale-faced, handsome young man in the cast staring blankly ahead, tears suddenly welled up in her eyes. She felt her heart breaking. She had heard some rumors during this time, that this young man was an illegitimate child, driven out of the house by his legitimate sister. She hadn’t seen any relatives visiting him, only some little thugs who came to mock him.

It was truly pitiful. The nurse thought, unsure how to comfort him, because while she felt sympathy for the boy, she couldn’t entirely shake the strange feeling in her heart when she remembered he was an illegitimate child.

In the last two weeks of the semester, Lan Shengzhe regained his composure and returned to school. He appeared behind An Cui again, practically begging her for attention without any dignity. However, An Cui had already dismissed him as nothing, completely ignoring his attempts to please her. The students at school saw this and began to gossip. Some mocked Lan Shengzhe for his lack of dignity, others were disappointed in him, and some simply found him shameless and annoying.

As expected, someone began to trouble Lan Shengzhe again, but An Cui remained indifferent, not caring about his fate at all.

One day, An Cui instructed An Ran to do her duty while she took a stroll in the corridor. The high school building for the third year was near the back door, which was always locked and remained the quietest part of the school. This was to allow the third-year students, who were at a crucial stage of their lives, to study in peace.

However, because it was so quiet, accidents often happened at the back door. Standing in the corridor and looking down, An Cui saw a group of students bullying someone. Nine students surrounded one person. An Cui didn’t know the nine students, but she recognized the one in the middle—it was Lan Shengzhe.

He had always subconsciously paid attention to An Cui’s class floor, so he quickly noticed her standing in the corridor, looking down. Her beautiful face was like a thorny red rose, her eyes cold and arrogant, sending a shiver through his heart. He felt a surge of joy, but others didn’t allow him to be happy.

"Lan Shengzhe, you shameless dog. A bastard like you has no self-awareness. How dare you even try to approach her?" the leader, a yellow-haired boy, mocked.

"Exactly."

"Sun, don’t waste your time on him. He’s probably just waiting for the young lady to come down and pity him," another boy added.

"I’ll give you a chance to lick my shoes. Afterward, you’re never allowed to come to the third-year building again. I’ll let you go today. What do you say?" Sun said, leaning over to Lan Shengzhe and whispering in his ear, "After I’m done with Lan Shengmei, I’ll ask the boss to beg for you."

In response, Lan Shengzhe suddenly clenched his fist and struck out at Sun. Sun wasn’t prepared, and a punch landed squarely on his nose, causing blood to pour out.

The signal for a fight was sent, and the scene instantly turned chaotic. Lan Shengzhe couldn’t fight against the others, but he was focused on attacking Sun, landing punch after punch on him with all his strength.

From An Cui's perspective, she could only see Lan Shengzhe surrounded by a group of people, lying on the ground, being punched and kicked, looking extremely miserable.

However, soon the sound of Huang Sun's screams came from the center of the crowd. The few people beating up Lan Shengzhe froze when they heard their "Brother Sun" shouting, "Quick, pull this madman off of me! Ah!!!"

Eight people struggled to pull Lan Shengzhe off Huang Sun, and then everyone was stunned.

Lan Shengzhe's face was covered in blood—his own, but mostly Huang Sun's, especially his chin, which was practically drenched in blood. He spat something from his mouth, and when everyone looked, they froze, instinctively stepping back.

It was an ear!!

Huang Sun was clutching the spot where his ear had been bitten off, his face also covered in blood, looking both pained and terrified, trembling all over.

As for Lan Shengzhe, his eyes were dark and vicious, as if he were an asura rising from hell. There was no trace of the submissive, self-deprecating demeanor that he had shown in front of An Cui, letting himself be beaten and scolded.

He didn't raise his head. He didn't dare let An Cui see him like this. He also didn't know what An Cui would think upon seeing this scene, or what would happen afterward. He was very worried that An Cui might think he was too dangerous and have him expelled from the school, sent to another one.

He had been too impulsive and lost control. If he had had a big enough rock at the time, he would have picked it up and smashed Huang Sun's head and filthy mouth into pieces.

He spent a restless night in his cold apartment, unable to sleep, and the next day, he saw a glimmer of hope. Huang Sun's family hadn't come to trouble him, and the Lan family had settled everything. He knew it must have been An Cui who spoke up!

This made him ecstatic and gave him endless motivation.

Because of the ear-biting incident, no one dared to casually bully Lan Shengzhe anymore. Those who still tried to bully him came cautiously, not treating him like a soft target. Lan Shengzhe, in places where An Cui couldn't see, behaved like a lone wolf, mercilessly showing his sharp teeth to any invader. But when he was in front of An Cui, he still acted like a dog abandoned by its master, always coming back no matter how many times he was kicked away.

"Lan Shengzhe, don't you have any dignity? You've worked so hard just to return to the Lan family and inherit the family fortune, but do you see anyone even giving you a second glance!" a girl angrily scolded, trying to save him.

Lan Shengzhe ignored her. She didn’t understand at all. None of them did. They all thought he was trying to get back into the Lan family, but only he knew that what he truly wanted was to return to... her side. This thought was so strong that he couldn't reject it.

It seemed that the desperate tactics and shameless pursuit had finally worked. Spring arrived, and after the new semester started, An Cui's attitude softened slightly, which almost brought Lan Shengzhe to tears.

A month later, Lan Shengzhe carefully reached for An Cui's schoolbag. When he saw that she didn’t stop him, a smile uncontrollably appeared on his face.

"Hmph." An Cui coldly snorted. "If it weren't for the fact that half of your genes come from me..."

She didn’t finish, but the implication was already clear. If it weren’t for that, she would have been even more heartless, not even giving him a chance to put on his sad act.

Lan Shengzhe understood well. He felt both relieved and bitter, like he had just eaten a candy with a bitter pill inside.

Lan Shengzhe moved back to the Lan family and returned to his original room. Life went back to what it was before, with him and An Cui spending every day together, eating, living, and going out together. Despite her bad temper, he thought she should be like that.

Lan Shuhua and others thought Lan Shengzhe was deep and scheming, able to bend and stretch to such an extent that it was frightening, so they became more cautious of him. Even 524, the intelligent mode of the system, thought that a life in a kaleidoscope of possibilities was terrifying. With the male lead's intelligence, acting skills, and scheming, if he became an enemy, he might not even know how he died.

They all thought that, given An Cui had never been kind to Lan Shengzhe and had repeatedly shown him disdain, there was no way he could have any real feelings for her. To go this far, it must have been to secure a greater benefit. After all, one was a bastard, and the other was a legitimate child. In such a special relationship, true emotions couldn’t exist.

Of course, Lan Shengzhe knew what they were thinking. He thought to himself that actually, their thinking was normal. What was abnormal was him—he was probably a pervert, which is why he felt this way.

However, things suddenly took an unexpected turn.

After school, An Cui wanted to eat the new mille-feuille from a shop outside the school, so Lan Shengzhe got out of the car to buy it. Just then, a ragged man approached.

"What do you want?" Lan Shengzhe looked at him warily.

The man grabbed his arm, his eyes greedily staring at him. "I'm your father!"

What?

Lan Shengzhe furrowed his brow, shook the man's hand off, and tried to walk around him toward the car, but the man followed. "You don't believe me? Your mother’s name is Chen Qingyu, she used to live at XXX in Green Willow Alley, I lived next door to her..."

Lan Shengzhe's face changed as he listened, growing more horrified. When he saw An Cui impatiently rolling down the car window to look over, he immediately pushed the man away and quickly walked over.

"What's with that person?" An Cui asked, looking at the shabby man who was staring at them.

"He's a madman," Lan Shengzhe replied, glancing back nervously.

Is he really a madman? Lan Shengzhe couldn't control his extreme unease. He secretly picked up a few of An Cui's hairs from her room and went to the hospital to do a DNA test.

An Cui, of course, knew what Lan Shengzhe had secretly done.

In the original novel, the male lead's mother had always thought this son was from the Lan family, because she didn't know that she had been violated by the man who lived next door after a night of exhaustion with Lan Shengmei's father, and ended up pregnant.

This was supposed to be revealed in the future, but now the plot had been completely altered, and Lan Shengzhe learned the truth much earlier. An Cui was curious to see how he would react.

Lan Shengzhe sat outside the hospital on a stone bench, his expression changing constantly, unsure whether to laugh or cry.

"You see, you are indeed my child, but the Lan family doesn't know. As long as we don't say anything, no one will know. You can gain so much from the Lan family..." The man, who claimed to be his biological father, whispered eagerly in his ear.

So filthy and ugly. Lan Shengzhe thought, looking at him, and the thought that half of his genes came from this man made him feel disgusted.

Lan Shengzhe came back around 9 pm, and An Cui was sure he had already learned the truth. But his behavior was the same as before, as if nothing had happened, making An Cui glance at him a few more times.

"What have you been sneaking around doing these past few days?" An Cui asked him.

"Big sister, don't wrong me. I haven’t been sneaking around. Didn't I tell you before I went out?"

"Then where did you go?"

"I met... a friend of my mother’s. I couldn't resist meeting him to talk, don't be angry."

"......"

Lan Shengzhe continued to live in the Lan family as if nothing had happened, going in and out with An Cui. This made An Cui, who had initially thought that the story would end here, a bit surprised. She had thought that, with Lan Shengzhe's personality, once he learned the truth, he would choose to leave.

But now, his behavior made her doubt whether Lan Shengzhe had been dazzled by the wealth of the Lan family, wanting to continue pretending to be their illegitimate child in order to gain future benefits.

In reality, Lan Shengzhe had indeed calmed his biological father, who had been waiting outside the school. His biological father wanted to use Lan Shengzhe to get money, so naturally, he didn’t expose the fact that Lan Shengzhe wasn’t from the Lan family and didn’t cause him trouble.

An Cui had been waiting for Lan Shengzhe to cause a big incident to wrap up the story, but after waiting for so long, she finally lost patience and used the time jump feature.

This was a game function that calculated logic based on the personalities of characters and past events. For example, if you jumped five years ahead, the system would calculate the potential outcomes based on the characters’ personalities and what had happened before, allowing the player to know the result without experiencing that time themselves.

Five years later, An Cui accepted An Ran's proposal and returned to the country to hold their wedding. The evening before the wedding, Lan Shengzhe, who had become the most promising newcomer in the business world, handed An Cui several documents for her to sign.

An Cui opened them to find various transfer and gift agreements for movable and immovable property, including shares in his company, several stores, and villas. None of them belonged to the Lan family; they were all Lan Shengzhe’s personal property.

"What is this?" An Cui looked at him.

"This is the dowry I prepared for you."

"The dowry you prepared for me? Since when does a brother prepare a dowry for his sister?"

Lan Shengzhe looked at An Cui, a fleeting trace of pain flashing in his eyes, then smiled and said, "Why can't a brother prepare a dowry for his sister? These things exist because of you."

Saying this, An Cui carefully reviewed the agreements and found no traps, so she signed her name.

When An Cui put on her wedding dress and the guests gathered outside, she was certain that Lan Shengzhe truly had no major schemes left, because by now, even if he wanted to do something, it was already too late.

She felt somewhat confused and puzzled. She watched the man who had come into the makeup room, said a few words to her, and was about to leave as the wedding was about to start, then called out, "A Zhe."

Lan Shengzhe turned around and looked at her.

"Did you hate me for how I treated you back then?"

He hadn't expected An Cui to ask this suddenly. He was stunned for a moment, then looked at her and said, "No, I don’t hate you."

What right did he have to hate her? He had no connection to her. He was supposed to be a stranger to her, yet he had inexplicably barged into her world and disturbed her.

When the man who claimed to be his biological father showed up and revealed that disgusting, ugly truth, Lan Shengzhe had uncontrollably vomited with intense nausea.

He wasn't An Cui's brother. The revelation of this fact made him feel ecstatic for a moment, but the next moment, it felt like he had fallen into hell.

He understood that he had fallen in love with her. But he had already deeply understood An Cui's character. If she knew the truth, she would no longer feel anything strong for him. Whether disgust or contempt, everything would calm down, and he would be sent away from the Lan family. Perhaps out of pity, he would be given some money, and that would be all. The bond between them would be broken, and he would no longer have a reason to please or get close to her. They would return to their original stranger relationship, and she would soon forget him, just like forgetting someone unimportant.

Thinking of this, he felt at a loss, his heart torn. He could only continue to pretend to be her brother, clinging to her side, hoping time would find a solution. But this was a vicious cycle. The longer he stayed by her, the more he was trapped in this identity. Because when the truth came to light, An Cui's feelings for him might shift from stranger to a repulsive thief.

He feared that An Cui would think he was a shameless person who took the place of another, someone with no connection to the Lan family, pretending to be her brother, gaining so many benefits from the Lan family—a vain, greedy, and shameless person.

She was such a strong character, a person who couldn't tolerate any dirt in her eyes. If he did these despicable things for the sake of loving her, she would probably not be moved at all and would only find him disgusting.

Helpless, he was trapped in this identity. His love for An Cui grew stronger with each passing day, and his jealousy of An Ran burned fiercely, almost consuming his sanity and humanity. But he didn't know whether it was An Cui’s whip that had left a deep impression on him. Every time he lost control, his nerves would twitch suddenly, the whip marks that had long since disappeared still ached faintly, and An Cui’s cold, burning gaze from that time would resurface in his mind, forcing him to calm down.

In this years-long internal tug-of-war, An Cui’s continuous excellence and brilliance made him feel ashamed of himself. He had to accept the fact that even if he wasn't her brother, An Cui would never like him.

An Cui would never like him. The exposure of the fact that he wasn’t a member of the Lan family would only make him lose the right to be close to her and stay by her side.

So this matter must remain a secret. He had to be her brother because he loved her so much.

At the wedding, Lan Shengzhe sat below, watching An Cui walk toward An Ran with her grandfather leading her, wearing her wedding dress. The diamonds on her pure white gown sparkled in the sunlight, but even more dazzling than those diamonds was An Cui herself, making them seem like mere accessories.

He watched them exchange vows and kiss. He smiled and clapped along with the other guests, but his eyes were filled with tears.


=============================================================================

Chapter 26: The Hero's Second Generation (1)

The second live stream ended unexpectedly, and the viewers in the Cui Cui 524 live room were left dumbfounded:

【??????】

【Did Cui Cui use the time jump function to suddenly jump five years ahead and marry An Ran???】

【Nooooo, don't skip ahead!! I want to see the romance! I want to see how cute An Ran pursues this gorgeous streamer sister, I want to see them fiercely fighting with their tongues, and I want to see them roll in the sheets!!】

【Wake up, people, even if they roll in the sheets, we won't be able to see it, the automatic dimming system, remember? But I still want to see An Ran and the streamer fall in love!!】

【Okay, seeing this ending, I actually feel a bit heartbroken. Lan Shengzhe seems a bit pitiful.】

【This ending is so satisfying!】

【Wow, amazing! I've watched so many live streams from this world, and in most of them, the female streamers either get tortured to death or thrown into the black room. This is the first time I’ve seen a female streamer pull off such an ending! I really love this ending!】

【This streamer is like a natural disaster in the live-streaming world, crushing scumbags swiftly and accurately, and just not talking about love!】

【Yet, I’m still watching until now…】

【I just want to know when the third stream will start, will there be any romance?】

【……】

The first recommendation was highly successful, and Cui Cui's fan count in the live stream room exceeded 400,000, with the final viewer count reaching a million. She had claimed the top spot in the New Streamer Popularity List and landed at seventh place in the Today's Tips Ranking, drawing significant attention.

This was already impressive, but what Cui Cui hadn’t expected was that the heat from this live stream continued to rise. It went viral on the largest social platform because of how satisfying Cui Cui's "completion" was, and the unexpectedly pleasant ending she achieved. Many players began to follow her method, and then...

【So, I completely followed the streamer Cui Cui’s method, except for not teaching Lan Shengzhe how to do problems or get first place in school. Lan Shengzhe's reactions were pretty much the same as in Cui Cui's video, and then I used the time jump function to jump five years ahead, but I didn’t end up marrying An Ran. When I jumped ten years ahead, I found the grass on my grave had grown two meters high...】

【Oh, what a coincidence, that happened to me too, hahahahaha [awkward JPG]】

【Oh, you guys too? What a coincidence, hahahahaha [awkward JPG]】

【……】

【Is it only the streamer who can pull off an HE (Happy Ending) using this queen-like approach???】

【I don’t believe it, I’m a level 10 actor, I’ll challenge this!】

As a result, many players, by accident, couldn’t resist going into the world of Seven Days of Demonic Love, trying to imitate Cui Cui’s route to get an HE ending. One fell, another stood up, and some popular streamers also went to challenge it. However, most of them found that their graves were overgrown with grass, and a few others who didn’t have grass growing on their graves didn’t get an ending as satisfying as Cui Cui's, making her success seem extraordinarily hard to replicate. Many players, feeling disheartened, claimed that the intelligent mode of the kaleidoscope of life wasn’t meant for humans to play, and they returned to the "idiot mode"...

524 excitedly told Cui Cui, "The tips you’ve earned from these two live streams are enough to buy a small apartment on our planet!!"

"Oh." Cui Cui responded uninterestedly.

"When are we doing the third stream..."

"Boring, not playing anymore." Cui Cui leaned on the newly bought chaise lounge from the mall, her golden long cigarette holder held gently between her red lips. After a while, she exhaled a puff of white smoke. When she left her game character, she reverted back to the image 524 first saw her as—elegant, noble, lazy, and proud. She looked like someone who could only be admired from a distance, impossible for ordinary people to approach.

524 was immediately terrified, nearly having a breakdown, and hurriedly knelt down to grab onto Cui Cui’s thigh. "Why?! Why?! This is so much fun, it’s not boring at all! Ah, do you think the story background is too boring? No worries, there are plenty of interesting backgrounds, like intergalactic, cultivation, Western fantasy, ancient times, and otherworldly..."

524 spoke until his mouth was dry, finally managing to raise Cui Cui’s interest a little. In order to prevent Cui Cui from quitting at any moment, 524 decided not to pick a random world for the third one. Instead, he carefully selected one, determined to show the picky Cui Cui Doctor the true charm of this game!

And indeed, Cui Cui regained her interest.

Because this world was quite special. The main storyline was about a female supporting character who was reborn and made a comeback, set in a modern otherworld.

The general’s wife of Country M gave birth to a pair of twins, and three years later, had another daughter. However, this daughter tragically passed away at the age of six. The general’s wife became melancholic, so they adopted a girl from an orphanage named Yuan Qingning. The general’s wife poured all her love for her daughter into this girl, and the father and the twin brothers were also very kind to her. Thus, she became one of the most beloved little princesses in Country M, second only to the royal family. The family of five was harmonious and happy.

At that time, General Yuan Zhan’s close friend, Colonel Xie, died on the battlefield, and his wife passed away from grief. They were left with an orphaned daughter, who was also adopted by the Yuan family. This girl was Xie Yingying, the future female protagonist of the story.

After Xie Yingying joined the family, all attention shifted to her. This girl came from a prestigious background, had an outstanding appearance, and a weak personality. However, under the protection of the family, she quickly became lively and cheerful, becoming the beloved little angel that everyone adored.

The first girl, Yuan Qingning, out of jealousy, fear, and resentment, began to play some petty tricks to regain the attention and love of her adoptive parents and brothers. However, not only did she fail, but she was also despised by the entire family and was eventually sent to a military school. When war broke out, she was sent to the battlefield as a volunteer soldier and died a horrible death.

Meanwhile, Xie Yingying became the "national songstress," and her song written for the soldiers became the new national anthem. She became a legendary artist, honored in history.

Before Yuan Qingning died, she was filled with resentment, and then she opened her eyes to find herself reborn to the day before Xie Yingying joined the Yuan family.

The reborn supporting character was more skilled than ever at hiding herself, with acting skills that were nearly perfect. She suppressed Xie Yingying and stole her opportunities, letting her experience everything Yuan Qingning had suffered in her past life. It was only right.

Finally, it was no longer a tragic story, but a thrilling one. However, Cui Cui didn’t plan to enter the role of Yuan Qingning, as it was too boring and lacked challenge.

Cui Cui liked Xie Yingying’s background. She came from a military family, with generations of bloodshed for the country, which made Cui Cui feel a strong affinity for military characters.

Therefore, Cui Cui chose to play Xie Yingying, the girl who went from the female lead to a cannon fodder role.


































